Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF896.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 68, article 1, section 20, as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 127, article 1, section 13, is amended to read: Sec. 20. TRANSFERS. (a) $152,650,000 in fiscal year 2024 is transferred from the general fund to the trunk highway fund for the state match for highway formula and discretionary grants under the federal Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, Public Law 117-58, and for related state investments. (b) $19,500,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $19,215,000 in fiscal year 2025 are transferred from the general fund to the active transportation account under Minnesota Statutes, section 174.38. deleted text begin The base for this transfer is $8,155,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $8,284,000 in fiscal year 2027.deleted text end (c) By June 30, 2023, the commissioner of management and budget must transfer any remaining unappropriated balance, estimated to be $232,000, from the driver services operating account in the special revenue fund to the driver and vehicle services operating account under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.705. (d) By June 30, 2023, the commissioner of management and budget must transfer any remaining unappropriated balance, estimated to be $13,454,000, from the vehicle services operating account in the special revenue fund to the driver and vehicle services operating account under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.705. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end